Maryland, session 2026, SB0220.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
11–723.
(a) Except where a term of natural life without the possibility of parole is imposed,
a sentence for the following persons shall include a term of lifetime sexual offender
supervision:
(1) a person who is a sexually violent predator;
(2) a person who has been convicted of a violation of:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0220*

SENATE BILL 220
(i) § 3–303 or § 3–304 of the Criminal Law Article; or
(ii) § 3–305 or § 3–306 of the Criminal Law Article as the sections
existed before October 1, 2017, if the person was an adult at the time of the offense;
(3) a person who has been convicted of a violation of § 3–309 or § 3–310 of
the Criminal Law Article, § 3–311 of the Criminal Law Article as the section existed before
October 1, 2017, or, if the person was an adult at the time of the offense, an attempt to
commit a violation of § 3–306 of the Criminal Law Article as the section existed before
October 1, 2017;
(4) a person who has been convicted of a violation of § 3–602 of the Criminal
Law Article:
(i) that was committed when the person was an adult against a child
under the age of 13 years; or
(ii) that was committed when the person was at least 21 years old
against a child under the age of 16 years;
(5) a person who is required to register under § 11–704(c) of this subtitle;
and
(6) a person who has been convicted more than once arising out of separate
incidents of a crime that requires registration under this subtitle.
(b) Except where a term of natural life without the possibility of parole is imposed,
a sentence for a violation of § 3–307(a)(1) or (2) of the Criminal Law Article may include a
term of lifetime sexual offender supervision.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the term of
lifetime sexual offender supervision imposed on a person for a crime committed on or after
October 1, 2010, shall:
(i) be a term of life; and
(ii) commence on the expiration of the later of any term of
imprisonment, probation, parole, or mandatory supervision.
(2) For a person who is required to register under § 11–704(c) of this
subtitle, the term of lifetime sexual offender supervision imposed for an act committed on
or after October 1, 2010, shall:
(i) commence when the person’s obligation to register commences;
and

SENATE BILL 220 3
(ii) expire when the person’s obligation to register expires, unless the
juvenile court:
1. finds after a hearing that there is a compelling reason for
the supervision to continue; and
2. orders the supervision to continue for a specified period of
time.
(d) (1) For a sentence that includes a term of lifetime sexual offender
supervision, the sentencing court, or juvenile court in the case of a person who is required
to register under § 11–704(c) of this subtitle, shall impose special conditions of lifetime
sexual offender supervision on the person at the time of sentencing, or imposition of the
registration requirement in juvenile court, and advise the person of the length, conditions,
and consecutive nature of that supervision.
(2) Before imposing special conditions, the sentencing court or juvenile
court shall order:
(i) a presentence investigation in accordance with § 6–112 of the
Correctional Services Article; and
(ii) for a sentence for a violation of § 3–307(a)(1) or (2) of the Criminal
Law Article, a risk assessment of the person conducted by a sexual offender treatment
provider.
(3) THE CONDITIONS OF LIFETIME SEXUAL OFFENDER SUPERVISION
SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) ALL STANDARD AND SPECIAL CONDITIONS OF SUPERVISION
IMPOSED BY THE SENTENCING COURT AT THE TIME OF SENTENCING; AND
(II) ALL STANDARD AND SPECIAL CONDITIONS OF SUPERVISION
IMPOSED BY THE MARYLAND PAROLE COMMISSION AT THE TIME OF RELEASE FROM
CUSTODY.
[(3)] (4) The conditions of lifetime sexual offender supervision may
include:
(i) monitoring through global positioning satellite tracking or
equivalent technology;
(ii) where appropriate and feasible, restricting a person from living
in proximity to or loitering near schools, family child care homes, child care centers, and
other places used primarily by minors;

SENATE BILL 220
(iii) restricting a person from obtaining employment or from
participating in an activity that would bring the person into contact with minors;
(iv) requiring a person to participate in a sexual offender treatment
program;
(v) prohibiting a person from using illicit drugs or alcohol;
(vi) authorizing a parole and probation agent to access the person’s
personal computer to check for material relating to sexual relations with minors;
(vii) requiring a person to take regular polygraph examinations;
(viii) prohibiting a person from contacting specific individuals or
categories of individuals; and
(ix) any other conditions deemed appropriate by the sentencing court
or juvenile court.
[(4)] (5) The sentencing court or juvenile court may adjust the special
conditions of lifetime sexual offender supervision, in consultation with the person’s sexual
offender management team.
11–724.
(a) (1) A person subject to lifetime sexual offender supervision may not
knowingly or willfully violate the conditions of the lifetime sexual offender supervision
imposed under § 11–723 of this subtitle.
(2) IF A PERSON VIOLATES A CONDITION OF LIFETIME SEXUAL
OFFENDER SUPERVISION, THE SEXUAL OFFENDER MANAGEMENT TEAM SHALL
REPORT THE VIOLATION TO THE OFFICE OF THE STATE’S ATTORNEY FOR THE
JURISDICTION IN WHICH THE VIOLATION OCCURRED.
(b) A person who violates any conditions imposed under § 11–723 of this subtitle:
(1) for a first offense, is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject
to imprisonment not exceeding 5 years or a fine not exceeding $5,000 or both; and
(2) for a second or subsequent offense, is guilty of a felony and on conviction
is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 10 years or a fine not exceeding $10,000 or both.
(c) Imprisonment for a lifetime sexual offender supervision violation is not
subject to diminution credits.

SENATE BILL 220 5
(d) (1) A violation of subsection (a) of this section does not discharge a person
from lifetime sexual offender supervision.
(2) On release from a sentence imposed under subsection (b) of this section,
a person remains on lifetime sexual offender supervision, subject to the original terms of
supervision, until discharged under subsection (f) of this section.
(e) During the period of lifetime sexual offender supervision, the court may:
(1) remand the person to a correctional facility or release the person with
or without bail pending the hearing or determination of a charge of violation of a condition
of lifetime sexual offender supervision; and
(2) if the court finds that the person committed a violation of a condition of
supervision, impose a sentence as prescribed in subsection (b) of this section.
(f) (1) The sentencing court shall [hear and] adjudicate a petition for
discharge from lifetime sexual offender supervision.
(2) A person may file a petition for discharge after serving at least 5 years
of extended sexual offender supervision.
(3) If a petition for discharge is denied, a person may not renew the petition
for a minimum of [1 year] 2 YEARS.
(4) A VICTIM OR VICTIM’S REPRESENTATIVE WHO HAS REQUESTED
NOTICE UNDER § 11–104 OF THIS TITLE SHALL BE NOTIFIED OF THE PETITION FOR
DISCHARGE AND OF THE FINAL DECISION OF THE JUDGE IN GRANTING OR DENYING
THE PETITION.
[(4)] (5) A petition for discharge shall include[:
(i) a risk assessment of the person conducted by a sexual offender
treatment provider within 3 months before the date of the filing of the petition] A REPORT
FROM THE SEXUAL OFFENDER MANAGEMENT TEAM THAT INCLUDES:
(I) A RISK ASSESSMENT OF THE PERSON CONDUCTED BY A
SEXUAL OFFENDER TREATMENT PROVIDER APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT;
(II) A POLYGRAPH EXAMINATION OF THE PERSON CONDUCTED
BY A POLYGRAPH EXAMINER APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT; and
[(ii)] (III) a recommendation FROM THE SEXUAL OFFENDER
MANAGEMENT TEAM regarding the discharge of the person from [the sexual offender
management team] LIFETIME SEXUAL OFFENDER SUPERVISION.

SENATE BILL 220
[(5)] (6) (i) The sentencing court may not deny a petition for discharge
without a hearing.
(ii) The court may not discharge a person from lifetime sexual
offender supervision unless the court makes a finding on the record that the petitioner is
no longer a danger to others.
(III) 1. IF, BASED ON A REVIEW OF THE PETITION FOR
DISCHARGE AND ANY ACCOMPANYING DOCUMENTS, AND WITHOUT A HEARING, THE
COURT DETERMINES THAT THE PETITIONER QUALIFIES FOR DISCHARGE FROM
LIFETIME SEXUAL OFFENDER SUPERVISION, THE COURT SHALL NOTIFY THE
STATE’S ATTORNEY.
2. IF, AFTER A NOTIFICATION FROM THE COURT UNDER
SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, THE STATE’S ATTORNEY REQUESTS
A HEARING ON THE MATTER, THE COURT SHALL HOLD A HEARING.
[(6)] (7) (i) The judge who originally imposed the lifetime sexual
offender supervision shall [hear] ADJUDICATE a petition for discharge.
(ii) If the judge has been removed from office, has died or resigned,
or is otherwise incapacitated, another judge may act in the matter.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.